Florida, session 2026, SB36.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsections (8) and (10) of section 464.015, 16 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 17 464.015âTitles and abbreviations; restrictions; penalty.â 18 (8)âOnly persons who hold valid licenses to practice as 19 advanced practice registered nurses in this state may use the 20 title âAdvanced Practice Registered Nurseâ and the abbreviation 21 âA.P.R.N.â 22 (a)âA licensed advanced practice registered nurse who also 23 holds a Doctor of Philosophy degree or a Doctor of Nursing 24 Practice degree may use the title âDoctor of Philosophyâ and the 25 abbreviation âPh.D.,â or the title âDoctor of Nursing Practiceâ 26 and the abbreviation âD.N.P.,â respectively, in a manner 27 consistent with the doctoral degree such person holds. 28 (b)âA person authorized under paragraph (a) to use a title 29 or abbreviation associated with a doctoral degree in a clinical 30 setting may not hold himself or herself out as a doctor to 31 patients or prospective patients in advertising produced 32 directly by the practitioner, including signage or written 33 communication, using such title or abbreviation without also 34 clearly denoting his or her licensed profession. 35 (10)âA violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the 36 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 37 775.083, except for violations of paragraph (8)(a) or paragraph 38 (8)(b). Violations of paragraph (8)(a) or paragraph (8)(b) 39 constitute grounds for disciplinary action under s. 40 464.018(1)(o). 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.